South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4641.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-53-2020(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful for a kratom processor or kratom retailer to: (1) distribute, dispense, or sell any kratom product to any individual under twenty-one years of age;  or (2) prepare, manufacture, distribute, dispense, or sell any kratom product that: (a) is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom substance that affects the quality or strength of the product to such a degree that it may injure a consumer; (b) contains a poisonous or otherwise harmful non-kratom ingredient including, but not limited to, any substance listed in Section 44-53-190, 44-53-210, 44-53-230, 44-53-250, or 44-53-270; (c) contains a an fully synthetic alkaloid including, but not limited to, fully synthetic mitragynine, fully synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other fully synthetically derived compound of the plant mitragyna speciosa; (d) contains levels of residual solvents higher than the standards set forth in Chapter 467 of the U.S. Pharmacopeia-National Formulary (USP-NF);  or (e) does not meet the labeling requirements established pursuant to Section 44-53-2030 and a regulation promulgated to implement the provisions of that section. SECTION 2.  Section 44-53-190 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (G) Any alkaloid, salt, isomer, compound, derivative, precursor, homologue, analogue, or other preparation thereof, that is substantially chemically equivalent or identical to kratom and including, but not limited to, mitragynine, 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other synthetically derived compound of the plant mitragyna speciosa. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----